Massachusetts, session 194th, H1625.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 265 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 43A the
following section:-
Section 43B. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
context requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Sporting event”, any interscholastic or intramural athletic activity, any organized athletic
activity sponsored by a community, business or nonprofit organization, any athletic activity that
is a professional or semiprofessional event and any other organized athletic activity enforced by
a sports official. A “sporting event” shall also include pre-sporting event and post-sporting event
activities and surrounding parking areas.
“Sports official”, any individual who enforces the rules of a sporting event including, but
not limited to, a referee, umpire, linesman or someone who serves in a similar capacity but may
be known by a different title or name and is duly registered by, or a member of, a local, state,
of 2

regional or national organization engaged in part in providing education and training to sports
officials.
(b) Whoever commits an assault or an assault and battery upon a sports official at a
sporting event shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 5 years, or
by imprisonment in a house of correction for not more than 2 ½ years, or by a fine of not more
than $5,000, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
(c) Whoever willfully and maliciously engages in a knowing pattern of conduct or series
of acts at a sporting event directed at a sports official, which seriously alarms that sports official
and would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress, shall be guilty of
the crime of criminal harassment of a sports official and shall be punished by imprisonment in
the state prison for not more than 5 years, or by imprisonment in a house of correction for not
more than 2½ years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
of 2